test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_32m_yđin_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Var.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - yđin - ok : # Noun 'kernel'  n_32m
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Nom: yin
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Gen: ytimen
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Par: yintä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Tra: ytimeksi
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Abe: ytimettä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ine: ytimessä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ela: ytimestä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ill: ytimheen
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ade: ytimellä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Abl: ytimeltä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+All: ytimelle
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Sg+Ess: ytimennä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Nom: ytimet
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Gen: ytimitten
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Par: ytimiä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Tra: ytimiksi
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Abe: ytimittä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ine: ytimissä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ela: ytimistä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ill: ytimhiin
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ade: ytimillä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Abl: ytimiltä
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+All: ytimille
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Com: ytimine
     yđin+Dial/Var+N+Pl+Ess: ytiminnä
